Connecticut, session 2026, HB05100.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That sufficient funds be appropriated to the Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the
continuation of the Department of Transportation's microtransit
services pilot program, including three million one hundred thousand
dollars for microtransit services in the city of New Haven.